North Carolina statutes. Chapter 15. Criminal Procedure.
Article 6. Arrest.

§§ 15-39 through 15-42.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1286, s. 26.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note following the analysis to this Chapter.

For present provisions as to arrest, see

G.S. 15A-401

through 15A-405.

§ 15-43.
House broken open to prevent felony.

All persons are authorized to break open and enter a house to prevent a felony about to be committed therein.

History.

1868-9, c. 178, subch. 1, s. 4; Code, s. 1127; Rev., s. 3179; C.S., s. 4545.

§§ 15-44 through 15-47.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1286, s. 26.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note following the analysis to this Chapter. For present provisions as to arrest, see

G.S. 15A-401

through 15A-405.